Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1095HZ (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 1005 Section 1. Section 321I.1, subsection 17, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. The operator of an off-road utility vehicle is subject 3 to provisions governing the operation of all-terrain vehicles 4 in section 321.234A , this chapter , and administrative rules , 5 but is exempt from the education instruction and certification 6 program requirements of sections 321I.25 and 321I.26 . An 7 operator of an off-road utility vehicle shall not operate the 8 vehicle on a designated riding area or designated riding trail 9 unless the department has posted signage indicating the riding 10 area or trail is open to the operation of off-road utility 11 vehicles. Off-road utility vehicles are subject to the dealer 12 registration and titling requirements of this chapter . A 13 motorized vehicle that was previously titled or is currently 14 titled under chapter 321 shall not be registered or operated 15 as an off-road utility vehicle. 16 Sec. 2. Section 321I.25, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 3. Upon completion of the course of instruction, the 19 commission shall provide for the administration of either a 20 written test or the demonstration of adequate riding skills to 21 any student who wishes to qualify for an education certificate. 22 Sec. 3. Section 321I.26, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025, are 23 amended to read as follows: 24 1. A person twelve years of age or older but less than 25 eighteen years of age shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle 26 or off-road utility vehicle on a street or highway, public 27 land, public ice, a designated riding trail, or land purchased 28 with all-terrain vehicle registration funds in this state 29 without obtaining a valid education certificate approved by 30 the department and having the certificate in the personâs 31 possession. This subsection does not apply if the operation 32 is part of a prescribed education training course and the 33 operation is under the direct supervision of a certified 34 all-terrain vehicle education instructor. 35 -1- LSB 1095HZ (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 1005 3. Any person who is required to have an education 1 certificate under this chapter and who has completed a course 2 of instruction established under section 321I.2, subsection 3 1 , paragraph âiâ , including the successful passage of an 4 examination which includes either a written test relating to 5 such course of instruction or the demonstration of adequate 6 riding skills , shall be considered qualified to receive an 7 education certificate. 8